Hawaii, session 2026, GM1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that existing law lists
program areas that no longer align with federal requirements
under the Adult Education and Family Literacy Act of 1998,
reauthorized as title II of the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act of 2014, and its implementing regulations in
title 34 Code of Federal Regulations part 463.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to update Hawaii's
statutory framework for adult and community education programs
to ensure alignment with federal adult education funding
requirements and current best practices in those programs by:
(1) Modernizing terminology to align with current adult
education practices;
(2) Adding English language acquisition and integrated
English literacy and civics education;
(3) Updating the term "homemaking and parent education" to
"family and community education";
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Establishing workplace literacy and workforce
preparation programs as a core component; and
(5) Defining which individuals are "eligible individuals"
for those programs that receive federal funding under
the Adult Education and Family Literacy Act.
SECTION 2. Section 302A-433, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§302A-433 Scope of adult and community education programs
offered. (a) As rapidly as resources are available and
interest is developed, instructional programs shall be initiated
in the following fields:
(1) [Basic Glcmcntary-education.] Adult basic education.
A foundation program in reading [aftd], writing,
speaking English, [writing,—and arithmetic] and
mathematics for [persons] eligible individuals with no
schooling or only primary grade training [-^], or who
need to strengthen their basic skills for daily life
or employment;
(2) [Advanced elementary education.] Adult secondary
education. A program [in—advanced elementary
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO


Page 3 ■ ■ 2297
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
education] of secondary-level instruction for [those
perHeens] £
(A) Eligible individuals who have [e-ompl-etod four to
eirghtr-y€a^5S—ef—&ehee-3riftg—aftd—whe—dee-i±e-^t©—©btarift
more complete mastery of the fundamentals;] left
school or had their education curtailed and now
desire to complete a high school equivalency or
adult school diploma;
(B) Youths sixteen or older who have been excepted
from compulsory attendance under section
302A-1132; and
(C) Youths sixteen or older who are in need of
courses to complete their high school graduation
requirements;
(3) [Sccondar-y-cducation.-- A program of secondary
edueatien—for—aduits—wh^T—in youths—left school
or for some reason had their cduca-tion curtailed and
who now desire to continue their education;—for those
yeathrs—wha-diave—beea—exeepfeed—fram—eempatsary
attendance under section 302A-1132;—and—fe-r those
youths who arc in need of courses to complote t-hair
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO
IIIDIillllHIIIIIMUIIII

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
fe-irgh—school graduation ■■rcquircrftGnts; ] Adult literacy
education. A program in reading, writing, and
mathematics for eligible individuals who need to
develop or improve their literacy skills to enhance
their personal, social, or employment lives;
(4) [Adult litoraoy oducation.-- A basic program in-roading
and writing English,—and arithmetric for persons who
need—to develop or improve-i:-hei-r mastery of basic
literacy skills in these areas for purposes of
efthafteiftg^-thelr£^-^e^?s-efhalr7—seeieiT—effipioyment
lives;] English language acquisition and integrated
English literacy and civics education. A program to
assist eligible individuals who are English language
learners in acquiring reading, writing, speaking, and
comprehension skills, including civics education to
support effective participation in community and civic
life;
(5) [Homcmaking and parent] Family and community
education. A program [-in- homomaking and parent
oducation] for [ail^-^the&e] parents and other adults
[who-dosiro training] in family life[,including]
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO

uniiHHiiHiiiiiiniii

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
skills, child [care,—nursing,—budgeting,—and-other
-instruction buoic to homomaking; ] development,
financial literacy, health and wellness, and other
areas that strengthen family engagement and support
children's educational success, including family
literacy activities that integrate parent and family
adult education, early childhood education, parenting
education, and interactive literacy activities;
(6) Workplace literacy and workforce preparation.
Programs designed to Improve the basic and
employability skills of eligible individuals to
function effectively in the workplace, including
contextualized instruction developed in partnership
with employers;
[(6) ] (7) Community education. [A program to] Programs
that facilitate understanding and enlightenment in
civic duties, responsibilities, and obligations for
all [pernsen-s] individuals who desire to keep pace with
today's community, national, and world developments
and who realize the necessity of continuing study for
the adequate fulfillment of their civic functions.
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO
• 5

Page 6 2297
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D.2
C.D. 1
Community education addresses responsibilities within
a given community, especially concerns related to
education and the schools, and offers additional
services to supplement and enrich the educational
program of in-school children and youths; provided
that these programs may also provide opportunities for
lifelong learning and community engagement;
[4-74-] (8) Naturalization training. The standard course of
training provided by the United States Citizenship and
Immigration Services [7—which shall-be- providod to all
t-hose porsono] for all individuals who have filed
applications for United States citizenship and desire
to enroll in [such a] course under the supervision
of the department; and
[-{-84-] (9) Cultural and enrichment opportunities. [A
program of adult and community- education--that -wirl-l-]
Programs that meet the interests and desires of [these
people-who wish to enrich and] individuals seeking to
broaden their cultural, recreational, and social
[interests.] knowledge and experiences.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO

IHlHIMilillllllHiilllll

Page 7
H.B. NO.
g [^ 2
I 'I
C.D. 1
2^A^ult/]jneaii^aii 3jidj^yiduaJ^e3^2h±^en yea^^s of a^e or old^r^
"Eligible individual" means an individual:
(1) Who has attained sixteen years of age;
(2) Who is not enrolled or required to be enrolled in
secondary school under state law; and
(3) Who:
(A) Does not have a secondary school diploma or its
recognized equivalent, and has not achieved an
equivalent level of education; or
(B) Is an English language learner.
"English language learner" means an eligible individual who
has limited ability in reading, writing, speaking, or
comprehending the English language, and:
(1) Whose native language is a language other than
English; or
(2) Who lives in a family or community environment in
which a language other than English is the dominant
language."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO

■■illlllllllliilllll

Page 8 2297
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3415 HB2297 CDl HMSO

iiniffllNMIIIffllllMH

H.B. NO 2297
I
w
o
b
o
b
APPROVED this 4th day of June , 2026

HB No. 2297, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
ZiWik —
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2297, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAFI
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
24-26